Utah statutes.
17C-2-304.   Challenging a finding of blight -- Time limit -- De novo
review.
(1)  If the board makes a finding of blight under Subsection
17C-2-102(1)(a)(ii)(B) and that finding is approved by resolution adopted by
the taxing entity committee, a record owner of property located within the
proposed urban renewal project area may challenge the finding by filing an
action with the district court for the county in which the property is
located.
(2)  Each challenge under Subsection (1) shall be filed within 30 days after
the taxing entity committee approves the board's finding of blight.
(3)  In each action under this section, the district court shall review the
finding of blight under the standards of review provided in Subsection
10-9a-801(3).
